Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Article 1. In General

§ 42-2-101.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Wyoming Public Assistance and Social Services Act”.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, § 48; C.S. 1945, § 25-142; W.S. 1957, § 42-1; Laws 1971, ch. 221, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

42-1-101

; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2.

§ 42-2-102.
Definitions.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, as used in this article:

“Commodities” means foods donated or available for donation by the department;

“Coupon” means any coupon, stamp or other type of certificate provided for the purchase of eligible food as defined by the supplemental nutrition assistance program;

“Electronic benefit transfer” means a system for the supplemental nutrition assistance program as an alternative to issuing a supplemental nutrition assistance program card. An electronic benefit transfer system is a computer-based system in which the benefit authorization is received through a point of sale terminal. Eligible households utilize plastic cards in lieu of supplemental nutrition assistance program coupons to purchase food items at authorized food retailers. This type of benefit may also be used to issue other types of public welfare benefits;

“Supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit” means assistance provided by the supplemental nutrition assistance program to eligible households in the form of coupons, electronic benefit transfers or cash that are redeemable at federally approved food retailers;

“Performance payment” means an amount payable to or on behalf of an eligible recipient;

“Public assistance” means financial assistance in the form of a performance payment, vendor payment, supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits or a payment under the minimum medical program;

“Public welfare benefit” means financial assistance provided to eligible persons in the form of a performance payment, vendor payment, supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit, electronic benefit transfer or cash. These benefits may be received from several state or federal welfare programs including:

Medicaid;

and (C) Repealed by Laws 2017, Ch. 108, § 2.

(D)

Low income energy assistance program;

(E)

Minimum medical program;

(F)

Child care program;

(G)

Personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER);

(H)

Supplemental nutrition assistance program.

“Social services” mean services specifically authorized by the legislature, defined by the comprehensive social services plan of the department and provided or purchased in accordance with this act;

“Approved educational program” means any program at the University of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college leading to a baccalaureate, associate degree, or certificate at the school or a vocational program approved by the department, or other accredited educational program within Wyoming leading to a baccalaureate, associate degree or nationally recognized certification or license. The department, may, by rule and regulation specify particular courses of study or majors that do not generally lead to employment and are not approved educational programs.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, § 1; 1941, ch. 125, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 25-101; Laws 1947, ch. 164, § 1; 1949, ch. 50, § 1; 1951, ch. 98, § 1; 1957, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 42-2; Laws 1965, ch. 90, § 2; 1967, ch. 195, § 1; 1971, ch. 221, § 2; 1975, ch. 84, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, §

42-1-102

; Laws 1979, ch. 155, §§ 2, 3; 1981, ch. 118, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 83, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1995, ch. 191, § 1; 1997, ch. 196, § 1; 2005, ch. 238, § 1; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 108, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(ix), substituted “certificate at the school” for “vocational program at any such school,” added “or nationally recognized certification or license,” and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a), substituted “supplemental nutrition assistance program” for “food stamp” in (ii) through (iv), (vi) and (vii), and substituted “card” for “coupon” in (iii); and “benefit” for “coupon” in (vii).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(vii)(F), substituted “Child care program” for “Day care”; added (a)(vii)(G) and (a)(vii)(H); and made a stylistic change.

The second 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (b)(iv)(B) and (b)(iv)(C).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The reference to “this act” in subsection (a)(viii) appears to be to “this article.”

“Public assistance.” —

Debtor's earned income credit was not exempt from garnishment as “public assistance,” since the credit was not a welfare grant but an incentive to work. Trudeau v. Royal (In re Trudeau), 237 B.R. 803, 1999 Bankr. LEXIS 1075 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. 1999).

§ 42-2-103.
Provision of assistance and services; duties of department; burial assistance; department of health state supplemental security income program.

The department shall provide and administer programs for public assistance and social services in Wyoming to those individuals lacking sufficient income or resources to provide themselves or their families with a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health or with services necessary for their well-being.

In carrying out subsection (a) of this section and except as provided under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act, the department shall:

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 179, § 2.

Establish policies and standards for the provision of public assistance and social services in accordance with this article and federal law and regulation;

Except as otherwise provided by law, establish by rule and regulation payment amounts and service levels for public assistance and social services programs provided under this article based upon the financial condition of the individual applicant or recipient;

Supervise the expenditure of state funds and federal funds allocated to the state for purposes of providing public assistance and social services in such a manner as to ensure that, to the extent funds are available and authorized by the legislature, funds may be used in separate state-funded programs to:

Use, to the extent practicable, state maintenance of effort funds in a separate state funded program to provide public assistance to eligible individuals who have exhausted their benefits under the federal temporary assistance to needy families block grant and are exempt from the five (5) year limitation under paragraph (e)(i) of this section;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 108, § 2.

Allow an individual receiving assistance to attend school as provided by W.S.

42-2-109

(a) provided the individual:

Has completed an employment assessment conducted under department rule or regulation;

Meets the income and resource eligibility requirements of the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program;

Qualifies as a full-time student under W.S.

42-2-109

(a)(ii)(A) and (C).

Cooperate with and report to the United States department of health and human services and other federal agencies as necessary to qualify the state for federal funding for public assistance and social services and comply with federal law and regulations governing the administration and expenditure of federal funds allocated to the state;

Serve as an agent of the federal government in matters of mutual concern and in the administration of federal funds allocated to the state for public assistance and social services;

Cooperate with other agencies as necessary to administer this article;

Limit approved educational programs under paragraph (iv) of this subsection to educational courses not to exceed the baccalaureate level, or to one (1) vocational training program;

Amend the state plan submitted to the United States department of health and human services to provide that the state elects as authorized by section 402(1)(A)(ii) of P.L. 104-193 to define work as including all activities permitted under section 407 of P.L. 104-193 plus satisfactory full-time school attendance as defined by W.S. 42-2-109;

To the extent funds are available and authorized by the legislature and if full-time students as defined by W.S. 42-2-109 are required by federal law or regulation to work in addition to attending school full-time, create a state funds only program using funds required for maintenance of effort to provide assistance to such students. Such a program shall take priority over other uses of the maintenance of effort funds available;

Not discriminate against married couples with one (1) or more dependent children applying for assistance, provided the department may maintain work requirements for married couples consistent with the federal requirements for work participation for two (2) parent families;

Provide benefits under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program to permanent resident aliens lawfully admitted to the United States under the Immigration and Nationality Act, as allowed under section 402 of P.L. 104-193;

Exempt individuals domiciled in Wyoming from the application of section 115, subsection (a) of P.L. 104-193 allowing payment of benefits under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities program (POWER) and the supplemental nutrition assistance program;

Promulgate and adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out this article;

Subject to the availability of funds, provide to recipients in an approved education program under W.S. 42-2-109(a) at least two (2) hours of dependent day care, if needed, for each hour the applicant is required to be in class, laboratory or other required instructional activity;

Conduct the eligibility and identity verification process as provided in W.S.

42-10-101

through

42-10-107

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article and subject to the availability of funds, the department shall pay the burial or cremation expenses of any recipient of aid under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program, supplemental security income or Medicaid at the time of his death and without sufficient means in his own estate or other resources to provide burial or cremation. The amount paid under this subsection shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) after consideration of funds available to the recipient from all other sources. In determining eligibility under this subsection, the department shall not consider as available funds, an amount up to or equal to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00) of the corpus of a Medicaid qualifying trust meeting the requirements of W.S.

42-4-113

. No board of county commissioners shall be responsible for any burial or cremation expenses in excess of the amount paid under this subsection. Burial or cremation expenses under this subsection shall not include those expenses relating to cemetery costs.

The department of health shall, by rule, administer a state supplemental security income program entitling any individual receiving payments under the federal supplemental security income program with no other income during any one (1) calendar month, to a payment for each month the condition exists. The monthly payment under this subsection shall be established by the legislature within the department of health’s biennial budget appropriation, which shall not be less than the required payment under applicable federal law. Rules promulgated in accordance with this subsection shall include procedures for applying, approving, reviewing and terminating assistance under this subsection. Decisions of the department of health under this subsection regarding entitlement to payments shall be subject to the contested case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

In administering this section and in addition to other requirements imposed under this chapter and the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act and federal rule and regulation, the department shall by rule and regulation:

Limit assistance payable under W.S.

42-2-104

to five (5) years for any assistance unit within a lifetime, regardless of location. Time spent on assistance funded with federal funds and time spent on assistance funded with state funds, shall be added together in determining the time spent on assistance for the purposes of this section. Adults who previously received assistance as a dependent child, excluding minor parents, shall be allowed up to the five (5) year lifetime limit under their own assistance unit. For minor parents only, one (1) year in the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program prior to reaching the age of majority shall be counted against the five (5) year lifetime limit. Months of assistance received for an eligible dependent child by a nonparent caretaker relative who is not included in the calculation of the performance payment to the dependent child shall not count toward the nonparent caretaker relative’s lifetime limit. Individuals who have received assistance under W.S.

42-2-104

for three (3) or more years as of January 1, 1997, shall be eligible for two (2) additional years of assistance used after January 1, 1997. Any individual who is totally physically or mentally disabled as specified by department rules, or who is a caretaker and stays at home to provide full-time care for a totally disabled or incapacitated immediate family member who resides with the caretaker because no other reasonable alternative, as determined by the department, is available to provide care and who otherwise qualifies for assistance under W.S. 42-2-104 shall not be subject to the limitation imposed under this paragraph. For an individual who is such a caretaker, the department shall waive any work requirements that unduly interfere with the provision of care and may waive other program requirements as appropriate. For purposes of this section an individual is totally disabled or incapacitated if he has a physical or mental impairment to the extent that it prevents the individual from achieving independent living, full-time employment, or participation in job training programs that will reasonably lead to independent living and monetary self sufficiency. The department may consult a licensed physician or other appropriate professional to make its determination of disability or incapacitation. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the department from requiring recipients to maintain, improve or enhance employment and self-sufficiency efforts and activities. The department shall waive time limits, and may waive other program requirements as provided in paragraph (viii) of this subsection, as allowed under sections 402(a)(7)(A)(iii) and 408(a)(7)(A)(iii) of the federal Social Security Act, as amended by P.L. 104-193, for a period not to exceed two (2) years for individuals who are fleeing for personal safety or for the safety of their children or who have been victimized by domestic violence or who are at risk of further domestic violence. The department may extend assistance up to one (1) year under either the federal or state program in addition to the five (5) year limitation imposed under this paragraph for the following reasons:

Repealed By Laws 1997, ch. 196, § 2..

Continuation of education leading toward an associate or a baccalaureate degree under the state funded program only;

Abandonment.

Require an unmarried parent under the age of eighteen (18) and the dependent child of the minor parent to reside in the household of a parent or in a supervised setting with an adult relative or court appointed guardian or custodian in order to qualify for assistance under W.S. 42-2-104, unless the minor parent is emancipated under law. Assistance under this paragraph shall be payable to the parent, relative or court appointed guardian or custodian on behalf of the minor parent and the dependent child. The income and resources of the parents shall be considered in determining eligibility for assistance under W.S. 42-2-104. If the minor custodial parent is living with a qualified person other than a parent and except for exemptions specified by department rule and regulation, the department shall through local child support enforcement agencies, enforce child support obligations of the parents of each minor parent, including the parents of the noncustodial minor parent. The department shall waive the requirements of this subsection if the only available households contain an individual who has been convicted of violating W.S.

6-4-402

or who has been charged with violating W.S.

6-4-402

and the charges have not received final disposition. The department shall assist law enforcement officials and the family of a minor mother to pursue the filing of criminal charges against the father of the minor mother’s child if the minor mother conceived her child while under sixteen (16) years of age and the father was at least four (4) years older than the minor mother at the time of conception;

Limit assistance payable under W.S. 42-2-104 for the year 2008 as follows:

Family Size Cumulative Inflation Factor Maximum POWER Payment 1 1.489 $290 2 1.489 476 3 1.489 506 4 1.489 506 5 1.489 536 6 1.489 536 7 and above 1.489 566

Click to view

Beginning July 1, 2009 and annually thereafter, the maximum payment level shall be adjusted for the percentage change in the Wyoming cost-of-living index for the previous fiscal year as determined by the division of economic analysis of the department of administration and information.

Establish only one (1) earned income disregard for determining assistance payable under W.S. 42-2-104 at six hundred dollars ($600.00) per month for any one (1) recipient. For married couples the earned income disregard shall be one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200.00) per month. The department may in addition establish an additional individual earned income disregard tailored to the individual person as part of that person’s self-sufficiency plan developed pursuant to paragraph (v) of this subsection, provided:

Such an individual earned income disregard shall be available only during time periods when the person is working at paid employment enough average number of hours per week to qualify as working for the purposes of section 407 of P.L. 104-193;

The amount disregarded shall not exceed six dollars and fifty cents ($6.50) per hour except that in high cost of living areas as defined by the department it shall not exceed seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per hour;

The disregard shall be structured to allow one-half (1/2) of the person’s preemployment personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) grant for a period not to exceed six (6) months and one-quarter (1/4) of the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) grant for an additional period not to exceed six (6) months;

The one-half (1/2) grant in the first period may be paid from either state funds or federal funds and shall count toward the five (5) year limit established by W.S. 42-2-103(e). The one-quarter (1/4) grant in the second period shall be paid from state maintenance of effort funds and shall not be subject to the time limits established by W.S. 42-2-103(e);

The use of the individual earned income disregard may be conditioned upon successful completion of other portions of the person’s self-sufficiency plan;

The decision to allow an individual earned income disregard in a particular case is discretionary with the department and the department’s decision is not subject to judicial review;

The individual earned income disregard shall be used only to the extent the department determines funds are available and are not needed for other purposes with higher priority.

In accordance with guidelines and criteria prescribed by rule and regulation of the department and unless otherwise qualifying for a good cause exemption pursuant to rule and regulation of the department, require the development of and adherence to a self-sufficiency plan with guidelines and assistance provided by the department, as a condition for benefit eligibility under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program. A self-sufficiency plan including timely completion of an approved educational program complying with W.S. 42-2-109(a) shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this subsection if adhered to. Any person not qualifying for a good cause exemption and failing to comply with this paragraph shall be sanctioned under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program. Subject to procedure prescribed by department regulation, any recipient may at any time request a good cause exemption from the requirements of this section;

Impose time limitations on educational goals of recipients of assistance under W.S. 42-2-104 who are under twenty (20) years of age and have not obtained a high school diploma or general equivalency degree;

Require that applicants and current recipients cooperate within a period specified by department rules to establish paternity and child support obligations, subject to good cause exceptions established by department rules and regulations. The applicant shall not be eligible for personal opportunities with employment responsibilities benefits and a recipient shall not receive benefits until the applicant or recipient has cooperated as required under this paragraph;

Provide that the department may waive program requirements, other than time limits which shall be waived under paragraph (i) of this subsection, for individuals who are fleeing for personal safety or for the safety of their children or who have been victimized by domestic violence, or who are at risk of further domestic violence, as follows:

Work participation requirements or state postsecondary education program restrictions may be waived for one (1) year, without re-evaluation, for individuals who have not exhausted their benefits under the federal temporary assistance to needy families block grant. Program requirements under this paragraph may not be waived for longer than:

One (1) year, unless the recipient’s circumstances are re-evaluated at six (6) month intervals after the first year;

Two (2) years, unless the recipient meets the requirements of subdivision (I) of this subparagraph and is cooperating in the development and implementation of a plan with the department and the local domestic violence agency to correct circumstances which have contributed to the domestic violence or the threat of domestic violence.

For individuals who have exhausted their benefits under the federal temporary assistance to needy families block grant, program requirements under this paragraph may be waived by the department only if the individual’s circumstances are re-evaluated at six (6) month intervals and, after one (1) year, the individual is cooperating in the development and implementation of a plan with the department and the local domestic violence agency to correct circumstances which have contributed to the domestic violence or threat of domestic violence.

In administering the child care and development fund provided for in the federal Child Care and Development Block Grant Act, and subject to approval of a state plan amendment by the administration of children and families of the United States department of health and human services, the department shall:

Annually by April 1 establish the hourly copayment required to be paid by parents for each eligible child, subject to the following:

Households with income at or below one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty level shall not be required to make a copayment;

For households with income above one hundred percent (100%) up to two hundred twenty-five percent (225%) of the federal poverty level, the copayment shall be calculated based on the following table. For each category of income in the first column, the parents’ hourly copayment per child shall be determined by multiplying the annual income dollar amount for a family of two (2) that corresponds with the percentage of federal poverty level in the second column by the multiplier in the third column, then dividing by two thousand three hundred forty (2,340), the annual number of hours of child care required by a full-time working parent, and rounding the result to the nearest five cents ($.05):

Household Category of Income Federal Poverty Level Income Factor Multiplier 101% - 125% 113% 1.25% 126% - 150% 138% 2.00% 151% - 175% 163% 7% 176% - 200% 188% 9% 201% - 225% 213% 12%

Click to view

In determining eligibility, the department shall use the most recent federal poverty guidelines for the applicant’s household size and income. In determining the hourly copayment for each eligible child, the department shall use the appropriate category of income in which the household qualifies;

If the department determines that funding will be inadequate to implement the child care and development fund for the balance of the appropriation period, the department may increase copayments as calculated by subparagraph (B) of this paragraph by ten percent (10%) for households whose income is less than two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level and by twenty percent (20%) for households whose income is equal to or above two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level.

From funds available under the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, any funds not needed for completion of the electronic benefit transfer system shall be used to make grants for materials and supplies to child care facilities, provided however that a facility receiving a grant shall agree in writing to provide not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the facility’s available care to persons determined eligible under paragraph (i) of this subsection, for a period commensurate with the amount of the grant as determined by rule and regulation of the department, or to repay any monies granted under this paragraph to the state of Wyoming plus interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum;

If the department determines that eligibility for other social services programs changes in ways that require a change in the formula provided by paragraph (i) of this subsection, the department shall report the change together with recommended legislation to the joint labor health and social services interim committee.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, §§ 1, 5, 24; 1941, ch. 125, §§ 1, 5, 12, 125; 1945, ch. 44, § 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 25-101, 25-105, 25-123, 25-127; Laws 1947, ch. 164, §§ 1, 2, 6, 8; 1949, ch. 50, § 1, 4; 1951, ch. 98, §§ 1, 2, 9, 11; 1955, ch 126, § 1; 1957, ch. 177, §§ 1, 2, 6; W.S. 1957, §§ 42-2, 42-15, 42-19, 42-23.1, 42-36.1, 42-38; Laws 1965, ch. 90, §§ 2, 5; 1967, ch. 195, §§ 1, 3; 1969, ch. 131, §§ 1, 3; ch. 133, § 1; 1971, ch. 213, § 1; ch. 220, § 1; ch. 221, §§ 2, 10, 14; 1975, ch. 84, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 85, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

42-1-102

, 42-1-116, 42-1-121, 42-1-131,

42-2-101

,

42-2-112

; Laws 1979, ch. 155, §§ 2, 3; 1981, ch. 118, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 83, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1989, ch. 107, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 235, § 1; 1992, ch. 22, § 1; ch. 34, § 1; 1996, ch. 111, § 2; 1997, ch. 196, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 102, § 1; 2001, ch. 184, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 214, § 1; 2008, ch. 9, § 1; 2009, ch. 82, § 1; 2010, ch. 31, § 1; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 187, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 103, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 108, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 179, § 2, effective March 6, 2017; 2018 ch. 5, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to federal maternity benefits, see §

35-4-401

et seq.

The 2004 amendment,

in (e)(iv)(A) substituted “P.L. 104-193” for “P.L. 104-109.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (b)(xiii), redesignating the remaining paragraphs accordingly.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote (e)(iii).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (c) inserted “or cremation” following “burial” in the first, fourth and fifth sentences.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (f).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013,
substituted “supplemental nutrition assistance program”
for “food stamp program” in (b)(xiii) and (e)(v), and
substituted “supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits”
for “food stamps” in (e)(v).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (e), substituted “six hundred dollars ($600.00)” for “two hundred dollars ($200.00)” and “one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200.00)” for “four hundred dollars ($400.00)” in (iv); deleted “to include disqualification” and “and be disqualified from receiving benefits under the supplemental nutrition assistance and medical assistance programs. The sanction shall be established at a level which would continue to assure children in a noncompliance household would be eligible for supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits and Medicaid.”, in the third sentence in (v).

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 20 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, in (d), added “of health” following “The department” and substituted “department of family service’s biennial budget” for “department’s biennial budget.”

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 103 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, added (b)(xvi).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (b)(iv), added “and
authorized by the legislature”; in (b)(x), added “To
the extent funds are available and authorized by the legislature
and
if”; deleted “other than the pilot program provided
by
W.S. 42-2-103(b)(iv)(B) which shall have first priority” in the last sentence;
and made a stylistic change.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 108, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (b)(iv)(B).

The third
2017 amendment, by ch. 179, § 2, deleted (b)(i).

Laws 2017, ch. 179, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

While no amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (d), substituted “department of health shall, by rule, administer” for “department of health shall administer” in the first sentence, “department of health's biennial budget” for “department of family service's biennial budget” in the second sentence, and added the last two sentences.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added "and subject to the availability of funds" in the first sentence of (c).

Federal references. —

As to federal Medicaid, referred to in the first and third sentences in subsection (c), see 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.

P.L. 104-193, referred to in the section above, is the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996.

Sections 402 and 408 of the Federal Social Security Act are codified as 42 U.S.C. §§ 602 and 608, respectively. There is no clause (iii) in § 42 U.S.C. § 608(a)(7)(A).

The Immigration and Nationality Act is codified as 8 U.S.C.S. § 1101 et seq.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 2, subsection 49, effective July 1, 2004, provides: “In accordance with W.S. 42-2-103(d), the state supplemental security income monthly payment for the period beginning July 1, 2004, and ending June 30, 2006 shall be as follows: (i) $10.44 for an individual living in own household; (ii) $13.24 for each member of a couple living in own household; (iii) $14.16 for an individual living in the household of another; (iv) $16.01 for each member of a couple living in the household of another.”

Laws 2018, ch. 15, § 2, provides: "Nothing in this act shall be construed or interpreted to require transfer of ownership of the lands specified in
W.S. 36-8-1501(c)(ii), as amended by this act."

Applicability —

Laws 2021, ch. 33, § 2, provides: “This act shall only apply to expenses incurred under
W.S. 18-3-504(c),
19-14-101(a) and
42-2-103(c) on or after the effective date of this act.”

Alzheimer's study. —

Laws 2005, ch. 211, § 1, appropriates $20,000 from the budget reserve account to the department of health to study Medicaid reimbursement rates for care of Alzheimer's disease patients. The study is to include at a minimum: (1) current Medicaid reimbursement rates for care of Alzheimer's disease patients and patients with other dementias as they compare to average long term care costs; (2) projected need over 10 years for beds in long term care facilities in the state to care for Alzheimer's disease patients; and (3) recommendations regarding the Medicaid reimbursement rate for care of Alzheimer's disease patients in this state. The department is to provide results of the study and recommendations to the joint labor, health and social services and the joint appropriations interim committees not later than October 1, 2005.

Laws 2005, ch. 211, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 245, § 3, appropriates $500,000 from the general fund to the department of family services for the purpose of providing training that uses best practices to improve parenting skills under a program funded in years 2003 and 2004 through the use of federal temporary assistance to needy families (TANF) funds received by the state of Wyoming as a one-time bonus payment.

Laws 2005, ch. 245, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2005.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Knori v. State Ex Rel. Department of Health, 2005 WY 48, 109 P.3d 905,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(2005).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Right of Wyoming State and Municipal Employees to Organize, Receive Exclusive Recognition, and Bargain Collectively,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 605 (1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes limiting or barring public health care to indigent aliens, 113 ALR5th 95.

§ 42-2-104.
Personal opportunities with employment responsibilities; provision; eligibility; unemployed parent program.

The department may through the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program provide financial assistance for a dependent child and an eligible caretaker. Financial assistance under this program shall be in the form of a performance payment or protective payment payable to or on behalf of an eligible recipient. Any individual not a relative of the dependent child but interested in or concerned with the welfare of the child and his eligible caretaker may subject to qualifications prescribed by rule and regulation of the department, receive a protective payment on behalf of the dependent child which shall not count toward the caretaker’s five (5) year limit for benefits under W.S. 42-2-103(e)(i) unless the nonrelative caretaker is included in the calculation of the performance payment of the dependent child.

In addition to any other state or federal regulation and subject to W.S. 42-2-103(e), an assistance unit qualifying under W.S. 42-2-103(a) with a dependent child is eligible for financial assistance under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program. For purposes of this subsection, a dependent child includes any child who is under eighteen (18) years of age and living with a relative in a residence maintained by the relative as determined by rule and regulation of the department, regularly attending school or its equivalent as determined by the department, or is expected to graduate from high school before the age of nineteen (19) years. For purposes of this subsection, a dependent child does not include a minor parent.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 196, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 196, § 2.

Subject to the availability of funds, the department may by rule and regulation create a program to provide financial assistance to assistance units in which there is a dependent child and both of the parents are unemployed.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, § 1; 1941, ch. 125, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 25-101; Laws 1947, ch. 164, § 1; 1949, ch. 50, § 1; 1951, ch. 98, § 1; 1957, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 42-2, 42-23.1, 42-23.3; Laws 1965, ch. 90, § 2; 1967, ch. 195, § 1; 1971, ch. 213, §§ 1, 3; ch. 221, § 2; 1975, ch. 84, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, §§

42-1-102

, 42-1-121, 42-1-123; Laws 1979, ch. 155, §§ 2, 3; 1981, ch. 118, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 83, § 1; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1994, ch. 25, § 1; 1996, ch. 111, § 2; 1997, ch. 196, § 1.

Need level violated federal law. —

The Wyoming department of family services's practice of administering the aid to families with dependent children program with the standard of need arbitrarily set equal to the benefit level violated federal law. Davidson v. Sherman, 848 P.2d 1341,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Fetal Rights—Why the Abortion “Albatross” Is a Bird of a Different Color: The Case for Fetal-Federalism,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 627 (1993).

For comment, “Fetal Equality?: The Equality State's Response to the Challenge of Protecting Unborn Children,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 193 (1997).

§ 42-2-105.
Application for assistance and services; investigation of applicant.

An individual or other person on his behalf may apply in writing for public assistance and social services under this article to the field office of the department located within the county or region in which the individual resides. A relative or other person interested in the welfare of a dependent child and his family may apply for the child. Application shall be upon a form and in a manner prescribed by rule and regulation of the department.

Upon receipt of an application under subsection (a) of this section, the department shall investigate the facts stated in the application and obtain necessary information to determine eligibility for public assistance and social services.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 88, §§ 17, 21, 22; 1941, ch. 125, § 10; C.S. 1945, §§ 25-117, 25-120, 25-121; 1951, ch. 98, § 7; W.S. 1957, §§ 42-8, 42-12, 42-13; Laws 1965, ch. 90, § 3; 1969, ch. 131, § 1; 1971, ch. 221, § § 6, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 84, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 42-1-107, 42-1-108, 42-1-109; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3.

Law reviews. —

For note dealing with effect of residence requirement on welfare, see XII Wyo. L.J. 50 (1957).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Residence for purpose of old-age assistance, 43 ALR2d 1427.